Maine, session 132, LD237.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 30-A MRSA §5681, sub-§5, as amended by PL 2023, c. 412, Pt. XXX, §1
and affected by §15, is repealed and the following enacted in its place:
5. Transfers to funds. Beginning January 1, 2026 and before January 1, 2027, no
later than the 10th day of each month, the State Controller shall transfer to the Local
Government Fund 5.5% of the receipts during the previous month from the taxes imposed
under Title 36, Parts 3 and 8 and Title 36, section 2552, subsection 1‑A and credited to the
General Fund without any reduction, except that the postage, state cost allocation program
and programming costs of administering state-municipal revenue sharing may be paid by
the Local Government Fund. Twenty percent of the amounts transferred to the Local
Government Fund each month must be transferred to the Disproportionate Tax Burden
Fund and distributed pursuant to subsection 4‑B.
Beginning January 1, 2027, no later than the 10th day of each month, the State Controller
shall transfer to the Local Government Fund 6% of the receipts during the previous month
from the taxes imposed under Title 36, Parts 3 and 8 and Title 36, section 2552, subsection
1‑A and credited to the General Fund without any reduction, except that the postage, state
cost allocation program and programming costs of administering state-municipal revenue
sharing may be paid by the Local Government Fund. Twenty percent of the amounts
transferred to the Local Government Fund each month must be transferred to the
Disproportionate Tax Burden Fund and distributed pursuant to subsection 4‑B.
Sec. 2. Effective date. This Act takes effect January 1, 2026.